Hawaii statutes.
§334-5 Confidentiality of
records. All certificates, applications, records, and reports made for the
purposes of this chapter that are maintained, used, or disclosed by health care
providers as defined in this chapter, health plans as defined in title 45 Code
of Federal Regulations section 160.103, and health care clearinghouses as
defined in title 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, and directly
or indirectly identifying a person subject hereto shall be kept confidential
and shall not be disclosed by any person except as
allowed by title 45 Code of Federal Regulations part 164, subpart E. Nothing
in this section shall preclude the:

(1) Application of more restrictive rules of
confidentiality set forth for records covered by title 42 Code of Federal
Regulations part 2, relating to the confidentiality of alcohol and drug abuse
patient records;

(2) Disclosure deemed necessary under the federal
Protection and Advocacy for Mentally Ill Individuals Act of 1986, P.L. 99-319,
to protect and advocate for the rights of persons with mental illness who
reside in facilities providing treatment or care; or

(3) Disclosures made by a court or the Hawaii
criminal justice data center of orders of involuntary civil commitment issued
pursuant to section 334-60.5 for the purpose of firearms permitting or
registration pursuant to chapter 134. [L 1967, c 259, pt of §1; HRS §334-5; am
L 1973, c 122, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 148, §1; am L 1999, c 87, §3; am L
Sp 2000 2d, c 1, §1; am L 2001, c 244, §§3, 6; am L 2003, c 204, §8; am L 2004,
c 22, §1; am L 2008, c 98, §2; am L 2014, c 87, §3 and c 214, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next